North Carolina, session 2025, HB312.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Madison County to relocate the
Madison County Courthouse, which was severely damaged by Hurricane Helene, out of the
floodplain.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H312-v-1*